California statutes. Financial Code
 22307; provided, however, that if prepayment in full occurs on or before the third installment date, all charges shall be recomputed as a percentage per month of the unpaid principal balance or portions thereof, based on the number of days actually elapsed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22309.

Except as provided in Section 22305 and Article 4 (commencing with Section 22400), no charges on loans made pursuant to this division shall be paid, deducted, or received in advance, or compounded. However, if part or all of the consideration for a new loan contract is the unpaid balance of a prior loan, the principal amount payable under the new loan contract may include any unpaid interest that has accrued on the prior loan. The unpaid principal balance of a precomputed loan is the balance due after refund or credit of unearned interest as provided in Section
 22400. At the time of making the loan, the licensee shall deliver to the borrower, or, at the direction of the borrower, deliver to another person, an amount equal to the face value of the loan and the note evidencing the loan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22310.

(a) Except for a rebate or refund pursuant to any administrative, civil, or criminal action, or any act of the commissioner, a rebate or refund required to be made upon payment in full of a loan pursuant to this division need not be made if the aggregate of all rebates or refunds required in connection with a loan is less than one dollar ($1).

(b) No licensee shall contract for or receive any payment required in connection with a loan for the purpose of avoiding a rebate or
 refund of less than one dollar ($1).

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22311.

No person in connection with or incidental to the making of any loan regulated by this division may require the borrower to contract for purchase, or agree to purchase, any other thing in connection with the loan. A policy of insurance of the type specified in Section 22313 and credit life and disability insurance is not prohibited by this section. A policy of insurance of the type defined by subdivision (a) of Section 12640.02 of the Insurance Code shall not be deemed to be a collateral sale, purchase, or agreement within the terms of this section or of Section
 22201 or 22312.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22312.

No person in connection with or incidental to the making of a loan shall require the borrower to enter into any collateral sales agreements or contracts, other than the contract of pledge, assignment, or mortgage or personal property, or if otherwise permitted by this division, the deed of trust, mortgage, or lien on real property, by the borrower to the lender as security for the repayment of the loan and charges on the loan. Insurance of the type specified in Section 22313, credit life insurance, and credit disability insurance are not prohibited by this
 section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22313.

Insurance on tangible personal or real property offered as security shall not be deemed to be a collateral sale, purchase, or agreement within the terms of Section 22201, 22311, or 22312, when all the following requirements are met:

(a) The insurance is sold at standard rates through licensed insurance brokers or agents.

(b) The policy is written to cover the property that is offered as security for a loan.

(c) The property is reasonably insured against loss for a reasonable term, which may be up to the term of the loan.

(d) The policy relating to personal property is made payable to the borrower or any member of his or her family even though the customary mortgagee clause is attached or the mortgagee is a coassured.

(e) Except in the case of purchase money encumbrances, the amount of title insurance shall not exceed the principal amount of the loan that is secured by a deed of trust, mortgage, or lien on the real property that is the subject of the policy of title insurance.

(f) The policy of title insurance insures the lender or is made payable jointly to the lender and the borrower as their interests may appear.

(g) Title insurance is placed through a title insurance company, duly authorized to do business in the state in which the real property is located, at rates comparable to rates being used by other title insurance companies duly authorized to do business in that state.

(h) Title insurance is placed in connection with the renewal or extension of a loan only when the additional cash advance is at least one thousand dollars ($1,000).

This section does not apply to any loan of a bona fide principal amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more, or to a duly licensed finance lender in connection with any such loan or loans as determined in accordance with Section 22251.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22314.

(a) Credit insurance shall not be deemed to be a collateral sale, purchase, or agreement within the terms of Section 22201, 22311, or 22312 when the insurance is provided in accordance with the provisions of the Insurance Code and this section. As used in this division:

(1) “Credit insurance” means credit life, disability, and loss-of-income insurance, or any combination of these coverages.

(2) “Credit life
 insurance” and “credit disability insurance” have the same meanings as defined in Section 779.2 of the Insurance Code.

(3) “Credit loss-of-income insurance” means insurance issued to provide indemnity for payments becoming due on a specific loan or other credit transaction while the debtor is involuntarily unemployed, as defined in the policy.

(b) A licensee may provide credit insurance with the borrower’s consent, the form to be approved by the Insurance Commissioner, and a copy, together with evidence of its approval by the Insurance Commissioner, and a copy of the schedule of rates together with evidence of its approval by the Insurance Commissioner, to be filed with the commissioner prior to the offer or sale of the credit insurance and in an amount not in excess of the amount of the indebtedness, and, with respect to credit life or disability insurance, may collect from the
 borrower an amount not in excess of that permitted by or pursuant to Section 779.36 of the Insurance Code.

(c) If the loan is prepaid in full by cash, a new loan, refinancing, or otherwise (except by that insurance) before the final installment date, the borrower shall receive a rebate of that amount computed in accordance with the formula approved by the Insurance Commissioner pursuant to Section 779.14 of the Insurance Code.

(d) When charges for the loan are precomputed in accordance with Section 22400, any permitted deferment charge may be computed on the combined total of the precomputed charge and the credit insurance charge. Only one deferment charge may be collected in connection with any loan contract, irrespective of the number of borrowers, and only one borrower need be insured. The amount of the deferment charge may be deducted from the principal of the loan.

(e) If life or disability insurance is provided, and if the insured borrower dies or becomes disabled during the term of the loan contract, the insurance shall be sufficient to pay the total amount due on the loan, excluding unearned charges, outstanding on the date of death, or all amounts that become due on the loan during the period of disability, as the case may be, without any exception, reservation, or limitation, subject, however, to the provisions of Section 22315.

(f) Any credit insurance provided shall be in force as soon as the loan is made. A licensee shall not require credit insurance as a condition of making a loan.

(g) If a borrower procures credit insurance by or through a licensee, the statement required by Section 22338 shall disclose the cost of the credit insurance to the borrower, and the licensee
 shall deliver or cause to be delivered to the borrower a copy of the policy, certificate, or other evidence thereof, within a reasonable time. In the event a licensee provides credit disability or loss-of-income insurance pursuant to this division, the licensee shall also deliver an understandable written statement to the borrower detailing the conditions under which the borrower will be entitled to make a claim under the insurance policy and the procedure to be followed in making the claim. This statement shall be first approved by the Insurance Commissioner.

(h) The amount charged to the borrower for credit life or disability insurance shall not exceed the amount established by or pursuant to Section 779.36 of the Insurance Code.

(i) Nothing in this article shall prevent a licensee from selling insurance as other business if authorized by Section 22154.

This section does not apply to any loan of a bona fide principal amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more, or to a duly licensed finance lender in connection with any such loan or loans as determined in accordance with Section 22251.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 107, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

22315.

(a) Credit disability insurance written pursuant to Section 22314 shall not provide indemnity against the risk that the borrower will become disabled for a period of less than 14 days. The insurance may provide indemnity for any single period of continuous disability of 14 days or longer, after which the risk may become compensable. The insurance may be offered with retroactive coverage to an earlier date based upon the disability having continued for a period stated in the policy, but if insurance with retroactive coverage is offered, it
 shall also be offered without retroactive coverage, and the premium rate for each coverage shall be separately stated in writing to the borrower.

(b) If insurance with retroactive coverage is provided, the coverage shall provide for a prorated payment based upon the fraction of the month during which the insured is disabled, provided that the insured is continuously disabled during the waiting period set forth in the policy. If insurance without retroactive coverage is provided, the coverage shall provide for a prorated payment based upon the fraction of the month during which the insured is disabled, after first excluding the elimination period set forth in the policy. For the purpose of this subdivision, a month is any period of 30 consecutive days.

(c) Credit disability insurance, if made available by a licensee, shall be available on a monthly or annual premium basis, and the
 premium by the month shall not exceed a pro rata relationship to the annual premium. Credit disability insurance need not be offered for a period less than the term of the loan to which it is applicable, and no credit disability insurance shall be written for a period in excess of the term of the loan to which it is applicable.

(d) The monthly disability benefit payable with respect to an open-end loan shall not exceed the monthly payment computed pursuant to Section 22453 on the outstanding balance at the time disability is incurred.

This section does not apply to any loan of a bona fide principal amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more, as determined in accordance with Section 22251.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22316.

A licensee may collect the cost of a lot book report purchased in lieu of the title insurance provided for in Section 22313. The cost is not included in charges as defined in this division or in determining the maximum charges that may be made under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22317.

On any loan made that is secured by real property, an appraisal fee not to exceed the actual cost of the appraisal may be charged by the licensee if a written appraisal is provided to the licensee by a qualified appraiser. Only one fee for appraising the same real property may be collected unless the borrower has obtained a new or additional loan and more than one year has elapsed since the prior appraisal. The fee is not included in charges as defined in this division or in determining the maximum charges that may be made under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22317.2.

(a) A licensee may collect a fee for use of an automated valuation model result prepared by a third party not to exceed the actual cost paid to the third party for a written automated valuation model result in lieu of the appraisal provided for in Section 22317. The borrower shall not be charged for both an automated valuation model result and an appraisal as defined in Section 22317 for the same property in a single transaction. Only one fee for providing an automated valuation model result or an appraisal for the same real property may
 be collected unless the borrower has obtained a new or additional loan and more than one year has elapsed since the prior delivery of an automated valuation model result or an appraisal. However, if a fee for an automated valuation model result has been paid, an appraisal fee minus the amount that has been paid by the borrower for the automated valuation model result may be charged for an appraisal for the same real property within one year if the borrower has obtained a new or additional loan. The fee is not included in charges as defined in this division or in determining the maximum charges that may be made under this article.

(b) A licensee in a loan transaction secured by real property shall provide notice as described in this section to a borrower of the borrower’s right to receive a copy of the automated valuation model result, provided he or she has paid a fee for the automated valuation model result. A borrower’s written request for a
 copy of an automated valuation model result shall be received by the licensee no later than 90 days after (1) the licensee has provided notice of the action taken on the application, including a notice of incompleteness, or (2) the application has been withdrawn.

(c) The licensee shall mail or deliver a copy of an automated valuation model result within 15 days after receiving a written request from the borrower, or within 15 days after receiving the automated valuation model result, whichever occurs later.

(d) Where the loan is proposed to be secured by real property, the notice of the borrower’s right to a copy of the automated valuation model result shall be given in at least 10-point boldface type, as a separate document in a form that the borrower may retain, and no later than 15 days after the licensee receives the written application. The notice shall specify that the
 borrower’s request for the automated valuation model result must be in writing and must be received by the licensee no later than 90 days after the licensee provides notice of the action taken on the application or a notice of incompleteness, or in the case of a withdrawn application, 90 days after the withdrawal. The notice shall also include the following statement: “An automated valuation model is not an appraisal. It is a computerized property valuation system that is used to derive a real property value.” An address to which the request should be sent shall be specified in the notice. Release of the automated valuation model result to the borrower may be conditioned upon payment of the fee.

(e) This section does not apply to automated valuation model results obtained by licensees on property owned by the licensee, nor to automated valuation model results obtained by the licensee in anticipation of modifying any existing loan agreement if
 the licensee does not charge for the use of the automated valuation model result.

(f) For purposes of this section, an “automated valuation model” is a computerized property valuation system that is used to derive a real property value.

(g) Nothing in this section authorizes the use of an automated valuation model result in lieu of an appraisal that is required under state or federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 356, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

22317.5.

On any loan secured by real property, a licensee may not do either of the following:

(a) Fail to disburse funds in accordance with a commitment to make a loan that is accepted by the applicant.

(b) Intentionally delay the closing of a loan for the sole purpose of increasing interest, costs, fees, or charges payable by the borrower.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 940, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

22318.

On any loan made that is secured by real property, an escrow fee of a reasonable amount may be charged. The fee shall be considered reasonable when paid to a company licensed to do business under the Escrow Law (Division 6 (commencing with Section 17000)), or any person exempted by the Escrow Law, provided that the fees are comparable to fees charged by escrow companies authorized to do business in this state. The fee is not included in charges defined in this division in determining the applicable maximum charges that may be made under this
 article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22319.

On any loan that is secured by real property, the fee to be paid to the trustee for reconveyance of the trust deed may be collected by the licensee for transmittal to the trustee. The fee is not included in charges defined in this division or in determining the applicable maximum charges that may be made under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22320.

With respect to a loan under this division, a fee not to exceed fifteen dollars ($15) for the return by a depository institution of a dishonored check, negotiable order of withdrawal, or share draft may be charged and collected by the licensee. The fee is not included in charges defined in this division or in determining the applicable maximum charges that may be made under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22320.5.

(a) A licensee may contract for and receive a delinquency fee not in excess of one of the following amounts:

(1) For a period in default of not less than 10 days, an amount not in excess of ten dollars ($10).

(2) For a period in default of not less than 15 days, an amount not in excess of fifteen dollars ($15).

(b) The delinquency fee may not be
 collected more than once for the same default and may be collected at the time of the default or at any time thereafter. If the delinquency fee is deducted from any payment received after default occurs, and the deduction results in the default of a subsequent installment, no fee may be collected for the resulting default. The delinquency fee under this section is not included in charges defined in this division or in determining applicable maximum charges that may be made under this article.

(c) For open-end loans made under Article 5 (commencing with Section 22450), a licensee shall not collect or receive the delinquency fee set forth in subdivision (a) unless there is a minimum of 20 days, inclusive, between the monthly billing date and the date upon which the minimum payment is due, exclusive of the applicable grace period provided in subdivision (a).

(d) This section shall
 not apply to precomputed loans as described in Section 22400.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 104, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

22321.

If credit loss-of-income insurance is provided pursuant to this division, it shall be subject to the following conditions:

(a) The insurance shall provide indemnity in accordance with the terms of the policy after any single period of continuous unemployment of 45 days or less as determined by the policy, after which benefits shall commence. The insurance may be offered with retroactive coverage to an earlier date based upon unemployment having continued for the period stated in the policy.

(b) The statement required by Section 22337 shall include disclosure of the term of the coverage, the conditions of coverage, the benefits to be paid, and the exclusions from coverage.

(c) The borrower shall sign a certificate of voluntary acceptance of any credit loss-of-income insurance purchased. The certificate shall state in boldface type that is larger than the type used in the loan contract that purchase of the insurance is not a necessary condition of receiving the loan, and that the insurance may be canceled by the borrower at any time within 15 days after it goes into effect. If the borrower cancels the insurance within 15 days, a full refund shall be made of the premium paid.

(d) The minimum benefit shall be payment up to the agreed amount on not less than four benefit payments, as stated in the policy, which
 accrue during a covered period of unemployment, except that during the first 60 days after inception of the policy, the minimum benefit may be payment up to the agreed amount of one-half the number of benefit payments, as stated in the policy, which accrue during a covered period of unemployment. The maximum benefits shall be established in the contract of insurance.

(e) If combination credit disability and credit loss-of-income coverage is offered, credit disability and credit loss-of-income coverage shall also be offered separately.

(f) Benefits may not be denied because the insured cannot establish a valid claim for unemployment compensation benefits under Part 1 (commencing with Section 100) of Division 1 of the Unemployment Insurance Code solely because the former employer was not required to contribute to the State Unemployment Fund.

(g) If insurance with retroactive coverage is provided, the coverage shall provide for a prorated payment based upon the fraction of the month during which the insured is unemployed, provided that the insured is continuously unemployed during the waiting period set forth in the policy. If insurance without retroactive coverage is provided, the coverage shall provide for a prorated payment based upon the fraction of the month during which the insured is unemployed, after first excluding the elimination period set forth in the policy. For the purpose of this subdivision, a month is any period of 30 consecutive days.

(h) When unemployment continues for a number of months equal to or greater than the maximum number of benefit payments stated in the policy, the final payment shall be equal to the difference between a benefit payment and the initial prorated payment.

(i) As used in this section, “benefit payment” means payment of an amount equal to a loan repayment installment or a maximum amount established in the contract of insurance, whichever is less.

(j) The minimum benefit payment offered may not be less than the amount of a loan repayment installment unless the borrower or borrowers have two or more sources of income. If the maximum benefit payment offered is less than the amount of a loan repayment installment, the borrower shall also be offered coverage in which the maximum benefit payment is equal to the amount of a loan repayment installment.

This section does not apply to any loan of a bona fide principal amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more, or to a duly licensed finance lender in connection with any such loan or loans as determined in accordance with Section
 22251.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22322.

A loan lawfully made outside the state may be enforced in this state as to the unpaid principal balance of the loan together with the interest, consideration, brokerage, and all other charges, to the extent of but not to exceed the unpaid principal balance and the aggregate amount of interest, consideration, brokerage, and all other charges permitted by this division in connection with a loan of the same amount made within this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22323.

Any person who collects or attempts to collect in this state the unpaid principal balance of a loan made outside the state and a greater aggregate amount of interest, consideration, brokerage, and all other charges in connection with the loan than is permitted by this division in connection with a loan of the same amount made within this state, is subject to the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22324.

Any person who contracts for or negotiates in this state a loan to be made outside the state for the purpose of evading or avoiding the provisions of this division is subject to the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22325.

Every licensee shall display prominently in each licensed place of business a full and accurate schedule of the charges to be made and the method of computing the charges. The schedule is subject to the approval of the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22326.

No person, except as authorized by this division, shall directly or indirectly charge, contract for, or receive any interest, discount, or consideration greater than the lender would be permitted by law to charge if he or she were not a licensee hereunder, upon the loan, use, or forbearance of money, goods, or things in action, or upon the loan, use, or sale of credit. This section applies to any person, who by any device, subterfuge, or pretense charges, contracts for, or receives greater interest, consideration, or charges than is authorized by this division
 for any loan, use, or forbearance of money, goods, or things in action or for any loan, use, or sale of credit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22327.

No licensee shall knowingly induce any borrower to split up or divide any loan with any other licensee. No licensee shall induce or permit any borrower to be or to become obligated directly or indirectly, or both, under more than one contract of loan at the same time with the same licensee for the purpose or with the result of obtaining a higher rate of charge than would otherwise be permitted by this article, except as otherwise required by the federal Equal Credit Opportunity Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1691 et seq.; Public Law 93-495) and Regulation B promulgated by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System (12 C.F.R. 202 et seq.). For the purpose of this section, “borrower” includes any spouses, whether jointly or severally
 obligated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 40.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

22328.

(a) This section applies to a loan secured in whole or in part by a lien on a motor vehicle as defined by subdivision (k) of Section 2981 of the Civil Code.

(b) Any provision in any loan contract to the contrary notwithstanding, at least 15 days’ written notice of intent to dispose of a repossessed or surrendered motor vehicle must be given to all persons liable on the loan. The notice shall be personally served or shall be sent by certified mail, return receipt requested, or
 first-class mail, postage prepaid, directed to the last known address of the persons liable on the loan. Except as otherwise provided in Section 2983.8 of the Civil Code, those persons shall be liable for any deficiency after disposition of the repossessed or surrendered motor vehicle only if the notice prescribed by this section is given within 60 days of repossession or surrender and does all of the following:

(1) States that those persons shall have a right to redeem the motor vehicle by paying in full the indebtedness evidenced by the loan note until the expiration of 15 days from the date of giving or mailing the notice, provides an itemization of the loan balance and of any costs and fees authorized by this division, and states the computation or estimate of the amount of any credit for unearned finance charges or canceled insurance as of the date of the notice.

(2) States
 either that there is a conditional right to reinstate the loan until the expiration of 15 days from the date of giving or mailing the notice and all the conditions precedent thereto or that there is no right of reinstatement and provides a statement of reasons therefor.

(3) States that, upon written request, the licensee shall extend for an additional 10 days the redemption period or, if entitled to the conditional right of reinstatement, both the redemption and reinstatement periods. The licensee shall provide the proper form for applying for these extensions with the substance of the form being limited to the extension request, spaces for the requesting party to sign and date the form, and instructions that it must be personally served or sent by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested, to a person or office and address designated by the licensee and received before the expiration of the initial redemption and reinstatement
 periods.

(4) Discloses the place at which the motor vehicle will be returned to the persons liable on the loan upon redemption or reinstatement.

(5) Designates the name and address of the person or office to whom payment shall be made.

(6) States the licensee’s intent to dispose of the motor vehicle upon the expiration of 15 days from the date of giving or mailing the notice, or if by mail and either the place of deposit in the mail or the place of address is outside of this state, the period shall be 20 days instead of 15 days, and further, that upon written request to extend the redemption period and any applicable reinstatement period for 10 days, the licensee shall, without further notice, extend the period accordingly.

(7) Informs the persons
 liable on the loan that, upon written request, the licensee shall furnish a written accounting regarding the disposition of the motor vehicle as provided for in subdivision (c). The licensee shall advise them that the request must be personally served or sent by first-class mail, postage prepaid, or certified mail, return receipt requested, to a person or office and address designated by the licensee.

(8) Includes a notice, in at least 10-point bold type if the notice is printed, reading as follows: 

“NOTICE: YOU MAY BE SUBJECT TO SUIT AND LIABILITY IF THE AMOUNT OBTAINED UPON DISPOSITION OF THE VEHICLE IS INSUFFICIENT TO PAY THE LOAN BALANCE AND ANY OTHER AMOUNTS DUE.” 

(c) Unless automatically provided to the borrower within 45 days after the disposition of the motor vehicle, the licensee shall provide a
 written accounting regarding the disposition to any person liable on the loan within 45 days after their written request, if the request is made within one year after the disposition. The accounting shall itemize:

(1) The gross proceeds of the disposition.

(2) The reasonable and necessary costs and fees authorized by this division incurred in repossessing the motor vehicle.

(3) The satisfaction of indebtedness secured by any subordinate lien or encumbrance on the motor vehicle if written notification of demand therefor is received before distribution of the proceeds is completed. If requested by the licensee, the holder of a subordinate lien or encumbrance shall seasonably furnish reasonable proof of its interest, and unless it does so, the seller or holder need not comply with its demand.

(d) In all sales that result in a surplus, the licensee shall furnish an accounting as provided in subdivision (c) whether or not requested by the borrower. The surplus shall be returned to the borrower within 45 days after the sale is conducted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 1115.)
-------------------------------------------

22329.

(a) This section applies to a loan secured in whole or in part by a lien on a motor vehicle as defined by subdivision (k) of Section 2981 of the Civil Code.

(b) (1) In the absence of default in the performance of any of the borrower’s obligations under the loan, the licensee may not accelerate the maturity of any part or all of the amount due thereunder or repossess the motor vehicle.

(2) Neither the act of filing a petition commencing a case for bankruptcy under Title 11 of the United States Code by the borrower or other person liable on the loan nor the status of either of those persons as a
 debtor in bankruptcy constitutes a default in the performance of any of the borrower’s obligations under the loan, and neither may be used as a basis for accelerating the maturity of any part or all of the amount due under the loan or for repossessing the motor vehicle. A provision of a contract that states that the act of filing a petition commencing a case for bankruptcy under Title 11 of the United States Code by the buyer or other individual liable on the contract or the status of either of those persons as a debtor in bankruptcy is a default is void and unenforceable.

(c) If, after default by the borrower, the licensee repossesses or voluntarily accepts surrender of the motor vehicle, any person liable on the loan shall have a right to reinstate the loan and the licensee shall not accelerate the maturity of any part or all of the loan
 prior to the expiration of the right to reinstate, unless the licensee reasonably and in good faith determines that:

(1) The borrower or any other person liable on the loan by omission or commission intentionally provided false or misleading information of material importance on their credit application.

(2) The borrower or any other person liable on the loan has concealed the motor vehicle or removed it from the state in order to avoid repossession.

(3) The borrower or any other person liable on the loan has committed or threatens to commit acts of destruction, or has failed to take care of the motor vehicle in a reasonable manner, so that the motor vehicle has or may become substantially impaired in value.

(d) Exercise of the right to reinstate the loan shall be limited to once in any 12-month period and twice during the term of the loan.

(e) The provisions of this subdivision shall govern the method by which a loan shall be reinstated with respect to curing events of default that were grounds for repossession or that occurred subsequent to repossession.

(1) When the default is the result of the borrower’s failure to make any payment due under the loan, the borrower or any other person liable on the loan shall make the defaulted payments and pay any applicable delinquency charges.

(2) When the default is the result of the borrower’s failure to keep and maintain
 the motor vehicle free from all encumbrances and liens of every kind, the borrower or any person liable on the loan shall either satisfy all the encumbrances and liens or, in the event the licensee satisfies the encumbrances and liens, the borrower or any other person liable on the loan shall reimburse the licensee for all reasonable costs and expenses incurred therefor.

(3) When the default is the result of the borrower’s failure to keep and maintain insurance on the motor vehicle, the borrower or any other person liable on the loan shall either obtain the insurance or, in the event the licensee has obtained the insurance, the borrower or any other person liable on the loan shall reimburse the licensee for premiums paid and all reasonable costs and expenses incurred therefor.

(4) When the default is the result of the borrower’s failure to perform any other obligation under the loan, unless the licensee has made a good faith determination that the default is so substantial as to be incurable, the borrower or any other person liable on the loan shall reimburse the licensee for all reasonable costs and expenses incurred therefor.

(5) Additionally, the borrower or any other person liable on the loan shall reimburse the licensee for actual and necessary fees in an amount not exceeding the amount specified in subdivision (e) of Section 22202 paid in connection with the repossession of a motor vehicle to a repossession agency licensed pursuant to Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 7500) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, and actual fees in conformity with Sections 26751 and 41612 of the
 Government Code in an amount not exceeding the amount specified in those sections of the Government Code.

(f) If the licensee denies the right to reinstatement under subdivision (c) or paragraph (4) of subdivision (e), the licensee shall have the burden of proof that the denial was justified in that it was reasonable and made in good faith. If the licensee fails to sustain the burden of proof, the licensee shall not be entitled to a deficiency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 716, Sec. 7.   (SB 1099)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

22329.5.

A licensee, or the agent of a licensee, that has received a notice pursuant to Section 7507.6 of the Business and Professions Code, shall not make a subsequent assignment to skip trace, locate, or repossess the vehicle without simultaneously, and in the same manner by which the assignment is given, advising the assignee of the assignment of the information contained in the notice. As used in this section, “assignment” has the same meaning set forth in Section 7500.1 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 192, Sec. 8.   Effective September 7, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

22330.
